Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 2 Organization and Administration

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency management disaster preparedness equipment grants-in-aid, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Defense Emergency Management Division, Chapter 155-2.

38-3-20.
Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency created; director; staff; offices; director’s duties; disaster coordinator.

There is established the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency with a director of emergency management and homeland security who shall be the head thereof. The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall be assigned to the Office of Planning and Budget for administrative purposes only as provided in Code Section 50-4-3.

The Governor shall appoint the director of emergency management and homeland security. He or she shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor, who shall fix his or her compensation. The director of emergency management and homeland security shall hold no other state office.

The director may employ such professional, technical, clerical, stenographic, and other personnel, may fix their compensation, and may make such expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds made available for purposes of emergency management and homeland security, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of Article 9 of Chapter 3 of Title 35; Article 1, this article, and Article 3 of this chapter; and the duties of the agency and the director described in Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46, the “Georgia Emergency Telephone Number 9-1-1 Service Act of 1977,” as amended.

The director and other personnel of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall be provided with appropriate office space, furniture, equipment, supplies, stationery, and printing in the same manner as provided for personnel of other state agencies.

The director, subject to the direction and control of the Governor, shall:

Be the executive head of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency and shall be responsible to the Governor for carrying out the program for emergency management and homeland security in this state;

Serve as the central authority reporting to the Governor on all matters relating to homeland security;

Have authority over areas involving imminent or current terrorist activity within this state, including, but not limited to, leading and directing the actions of the Homeland Security Task Force and the Emergency Operations Command where such Emergency Operations Command shall not usurp the operational authority of participating agencies but shall be responsible only for coordinating the public safety response to natural disasters, homeland security activities, and other emergencies within the state;

Coordinate the activities of all organizations for emergency management and homeland security within the state;

Maintain liaison with and cooperate with emergency management agencies and organizations of other states and of the federal government;

Through risk and threat assessments, coordinate plans for timely and complete responses through a network of state, local, and federal organizations, including, but not limited to, the coordination of efficient and timely flow of information;

Be responsible for crisis and consequence management planning, including, but not limited to, measures to identify, acquire, and plan the use of resources needed to anticipate, prevent, or resolve a threat or act of terrorism;

Coordinate and review activities involving homeland security within any agency, authority, or entity of this state, including, but not limited to, homeland security activities found within the Department of Public Safety, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the Georgia National Guard, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Community Health, and the Department of Public Health;

Evaluate information developed by the criminal justice community in regard to threats or potential threats of terrorism;

Serve as this state’s security manager for the purpose of identifying and processing state personnel for security clearances through the United States Department of Homeland Security; and

Have such additional authority, duties, and responsibilities authorized by Article 1, this article, and Article 3 of this chapter as may be prescribed by the Governor and such additional authority, duties, and responsibilities as described in Article 9 of Chapter 3 of Title 35 and Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46, the “Georgia Emergency Telephone Number 9-1-1 Service Act of 1977,” as amended.

The director of emergency management and homeland security shall also be the disaster coordinator and shall act for the Governor when requested to do so.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 4; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 171, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 468, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1258, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 372, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 7/HB 470; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 6/SB 416; Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 1-2/HB 779.

Cross references.

Department of Defense generally, §

38-2-130

et seq.

38-3-21.
Director authorized to make rules and regulations.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the director of emergency management shall be authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be required to effectuate the purposes of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 15; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.

38-3-22.
Governor’s emergency management powers and duties.

The Governor shall have general direction and control of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency and shall be responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of Article 1, this article, and Article 3 of this chapter and, in the event of disaster or emergency beyond local control, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this state.

In performing his duties under Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, the Governor is further authorized and empowered:

To make, amend, and rescind the necessary orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the provisions of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter with due consideration to the plans of the federal government;

To prepare a comprehensive plan and program for emergency management in this state, such plan and program to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management and preparedness plans of the federal government and of other states to the fullest possible extent; and to coordinate the preparation of plans and programs for emergency management by the political subdivisions of this state, such plans to be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plan and program of this state to the fullest possible extent;

In accordance with the plan and program for emergency management in this state, to ascertain the requirements of the state or the political subdivisions thereof for food, clothing, and other necessities of life, in the event of a manmade or natural emergency or disaster, or enemy attack; to plan for and procure supplies, medicines, materials, and equipment, and to use and employ from time to time any of the property, services, and resources within the state for the purposes set forth in Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter; to make surveys of the industries, resources, and facilities within the state as are necessary to carry out the purposes of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter; to institute training programs and public information programs, to take all other preparatory steps including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual emergency or disaster, and to ensure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management personnel in time of need;

To coordinate with the President, the heads of the armed forces, the agency or officers responsible for emergency management and defense of the United States, and the officers and agencies of other states, matters pertaining to emergency management in the state and nation and the incidents thereof; and in connection therewith, to take any measures which he may deem proper to carry into effect any request of the President and the appropriate federal officers and agencies for any action looking to emergency management, including the direction or control of emergency management exercises he deems necessary and appropriate for operational capability;

To take such action and give such directions to state and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter and with the orders, rules, and regulations made pursuant thereto;

To employ such measures and give such directions to the Department of Public Health and local boards of health as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter or with the findings or recommendations of the Department of Public Health and local boards of health by reason of conditions arising from emergencies or disasters, manmade or natural, or the threat of enemy attack or otherwise;

To utilize the services and facilities of existing offices and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof; and all such offices and agencies shall cooperate with and extend their services and facilities to the Governor as he may request;

To establish agencies and offices and to appoint executive, technical, clerical, and other personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter including, with due consideration to the recommendations of the local authorities, full-time state and regional area or field coordinators;

To delegate any authority vested in him under Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter;

On behalf of this state to enter into reciprocal aid agreements or compacts with other states and the federal government, either on a state-wide basis or local political subdivision basis or with a neighboring state. Such mutual aid arrangements shall include but not be limited to the furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, medicine, and other supplies; engineering services; emergency housing; police services; national or state guards while under the control of the state; health, medical, and related services; fire-fighting, rescue, transportation, and construction services and equipment; personnel necessary to provide or conduct these services; such other supplies, equipment, facilities, personnel, and services as may be needed; the reimbursement of costs and expenses for equipment, supplies, personnel, and similar items for mobile support units; and fire-fighting, police, and health units on such terms and conditions as are deemed necessary; and

To sponsor and develop mutual aid plans and agreements between the political subdivisions of the state, similar to the mutual aid arrangements with other states referred to in paragraph (10) of this subsection.

In addition to the emergency and disaster prevention measures included in the state and local emergency management plans, the Governor shall be empowered to make such studies, surveys, or analyses of potential emergency or disaster areas of the state as he deems necessary, both public and private, to prevent or reduce the harmful consequences of emergencies or disasters resulting from manmade or natural causes or from enemy attack; and to develop or cause to be developed measures to reduce the harmful consequences indicated in the studies, surveys, or analyses.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1258, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 7/SB 416.

Cross references.

Governor’s power to postpone or extend qualifying periods for election during state of emergency, §

21-2-50.1

.

Cooperation between Georgia and other states generally, T. 28, C. 6.

Further provisions regarding emergency powers of Governor, §§

38-2-6

,

38-3-51

, 45-12-29 et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

38-3-22.1.
Safety plan addressing threat of terrorism required of state agencies or authorities; exemptions; training and technical assistance; confidentiality of plans and related documentation.

Every state agency or authority, except those exempted in subsection (b) of this Code section, shall prepare an agency safety plan to address the threat of terrorism, to respond effectively to such incidents, and to provide a safe environment for state personnel and for those citizens conducting business with state agencies. In addition to acts of terrorism, such plan shall also address preparedness for natural disasters, hazardous materials or radiological accidents, and acts of violence. The safety plans of agencies and authorities shall be prepared with input from the appropriate supervisors and rank-and-file employees and local law enforcement, fire service, public safety, and emergency management agencies. Such plans shall be reviewed internally and, if necessary, updated annually. Such plans shall be submitted to the local emergency management agency.

The Department of Public Safety, the Department of Corrections, and any other state agency which operates secured facilities shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Subject to the availability of funds for such purpose, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall provide training and technical assistance to agencies and authorities and may provide such training and technical assistance to local units of government and to critical facilities operated by the private sector. Such training and technical assistance shall include, but not be limited to, crisis response team development, site surveys and safety audits, crisis management planning, exercise design, safe school planning, emergency operations planning, search and seizure, bomb threat management, and model safety plans.

The following records shall not be subject to public inspection or disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50:

Site surveys, safety audits, and vulnerability assessments performed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section; and

Any other record produced pursuant to this Code section the disclosure of which would, in the determination of the director of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, endanger the life or physical safety of any person or persons or the physical safety of any public property.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-22.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 743, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 8/SB 416.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “operates” was substituted for “operate” in subsection (b).

38-3-22.2.
Sharing and reporting of cyber attacks and data breaches; reports or records confidential; construction with other provisions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Agency” means:

The executive, judicial, or legislative branch of this state and any department, agency, board, bureau, office, commission, public corporation, and authority thereof;

Every county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of this state;

Every department, agency, board, bureau, office, commission, authority, or similar body of each such county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of this state; and

Every city, county, regional, or other authority established pursuant to the laws of this state.

Such term shall not include any county, municipal corporation, or public corporation or any authority of a county, municipal corporation, or public corporation when such county, municipal corporation, public corporation, or authority is acting in the capacity of a provider of wholesale or retail electric or gas service or in the capacity of a conduit through which a municipal corporation furnishes electric or gas service.

“Utility” means any publicly, privately, or cooperatively owned line, facility, or system for producing, transmitting, or distributing power, electricity, light, heat, or gas.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, every agency shall report to the director of emergency management and homeland security, or his or her designee, any cyber attack incident, data breach, or identified use of malware on an agency or computer or network determined by the director to be the type of cyber attack, data breach, or use of malware to create a life-safety event, substantially impact the security of data and information systems, or affect critical systems, equipment, or service delivery.

The reporting requirements of paragraph (1) of this Code section shall be satisfied if:

The cyber attack incident, data breach, or identified use of malware upon an agency is of a nature required to be reported to the United States government or any agency thereof or the agency elects to report such cyber attack incident, data breach, or identified use of malware to the United States government or any agency thereof; and

Within two hours of making such report to the United States government or any agency thereof, the agency provides substantially the same information to the director of emergency management and homeland security or his or her designee.

The director of emergency management and homeland security shall, subject to approval by the Governor, promulgate rules and regulations specifying the reporting mechanism for making a report under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection and the required information and time frame for making a report under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Every utility shall report to the director of emergency management and homeland security, or his or her designee, any cyber attack incident, data breach, or identified use of malware on a utility computer or network as such information is required to be reported to the United States government or any agency thereof. Within two hours of making such report to the United States government or any agency thereof, the utility shall provide substantially the same information to the director of emergency management and homeland security or his or her designee; provided, however, if such information is prohibited under any federal law, rule, or regulation from being disseminated, the utility shall provide such information upon the expiration or lifting of such prohibition.

Any reports or records produced pursuant to this Code section shall not be subject to public inspection or disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

Nothing in this Code section shall relieve any agency or utility of any duty that may exist under law to notify any person impacted by a cyber attack incident, data breach, or identified use of malware, including, but not limited to, any notice required under Article 34 of Chapter 1 of Title 10.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-22.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 11, § 1/HB 156.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 25, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the establishment of the Airport Antiterrorism Training Committee and related annual training.
The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

38-3-22.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 743, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 632, § 3/HB 49; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 38/HB 942 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 1-3/HB 779, effective July 1, 2018.

38-3-22.3.
Memorandum of agreement with military commands in this state to enhance opportunities for Georgians.

If the Governor makes a determination that a memorandum of agreement with one or more of the major military commands established in this state would substantially enhance the education or job placement of Georgians in the area of science, technology, engineering, math, or cyber security, he or she is authorized to enter into such an agreement, provided that any state expenditures provided for in such an agreement shall be subject to appropriations.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-22.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 11, § 1/HB 156.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 25, 2021.

38-3-23.
Investigations and surveys; subpoena power; cooperation.

For the purpose of making surveys and investigations and obtaining information, except the investigation of subversive activities that are the responsibility of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the Governor may compel by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records, and documents of individuals, firms, associations, and corporations. All officers, boards, commissions, and departments of the state and the political subdivisions thereof having information with respect thereto shall cooperate with and assist him in making the investigations and surveys.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 12.

38-3-24.
Traffic control; plans, regulations, and coordination.

The Governor may formulate and execute plans and regulations for the control of traffic in order to provide for the rapid and safe movement of evacuation over public highways and streets of people, troops, or vehicles and of materials for national defense or for use in any defense industry. He may coordinate the activities of the departments or agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof concerned directly or indirectly with public highways and streets in a manner which will best effectuate such plans.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 13.

38-3-25.
Lease or loan of state property for national or local purposes; transfer of state personnel; local authorities empowered to utilize property.

Whenever the Governor deems it to be in the public interest and notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, he may:

Authorize any department or agency of the state to lease or lend, on such terms and conditions as he may deem necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the state, any real or personal property of the state government to the President, the heads of the armed forces, or to the emergency management agency or officials of the United States; and

Enter into a contract on behalf of the state for the lease or loan to any political subdivision of the state, on such terms and conditions as he may deem necessary to promote the public welfare and protect the interests of the state, of any real or personal property of the state government or the temporary transfer or employment of personnel of the state government to or by any political subdivision of the state.

The mayor, chief executive, or executive body of each political subdivision of the state may, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law:

Enter into a contract or lease with the state, or accept any loan, or employ personnel as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section. Furthermore, the political subdivision may equip, maintain, utilize, and operate any such property and employ necessary personnel therefor in accordance with the purposes for which the agreement was executed; and

Do all things and perform any and all acts which he may deem necessary to effectuate the purpose for which the contract was entered into.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 14; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.

38-3-26.
Mobile support units; organization; rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities, and compensation, of employees; reimbursement to localities and out-of-state units; service out of state.

The Governor, or the director of emergency management at the request of the Governor, is authorized to create and establish such number of mobile support units as may be necessary to reinforce emergency management organizations in stricken areas and with due consideration of the plans of the federal government and of other states. He shall appoint a commander for each unit who shall have primary responsibility for the organization, administration, and operation of the unit. Mobile support units shall be called to duty upon orders of the Governor or the director and shall perform their functions in any part of the state or, upon the conditions specified in this Code section, in other states.

Personnel of mobile support units while on duty, whether within or outside the state, shall:

If they are employees of the state, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment;

If they are employees of a political subdivision of the state and, whether serving within or outside the political subdivision, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities and receive the compensation incidental to their employment; and

If they are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, be entitled to adequate compensation incidental to their employment by the state for their services and to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this state. All personnel of mobile support units, while on duty, shall be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of emergency management activities in the area in which they are serving and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses.

The state shall reimburse a political subdivision for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence, and maintenance expenses of employees of the political subdivision while serving as members of a mobile unit; for all payments for death, disability, or injury of the employees incurred in the course of such duty; and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of the political subdivision resulting from the operation of the mobile support unit.

Whenever a mobile support unit of another state shall render aid in this state pursuant to the orders of the governor of its home state and upon the request of the Governor of this state, this state shall reimburse the other state for the compensation paid and actual and necessary travel, subsistence, and maintenance expenses of the personnel of the mobile support unit while rendering the aid; for all payments for death, disability, or injury of the personnel incurred in the course of rendering the aid; and for all losses of or damage to supplies and equipment of the other state or a political subdivision thereof resulting from the rendering of the aid; provided, however, that the laws of such other state contain provisions substantially similar to this Code section or that provisions to the foregoing effect are embodied in a reciprocal mutual aid agreement or compact or that the federal government has authorized or agreed to make reimbursement for the mutual aid as above provided.

No personnel of mobile support units of this state shall be ordered by the Governor to operate in any other state unless the laws of the other state contain provisions substantially similar to this Code section, or unless the reciprocal mutual aid agreements or compacts include provisions providing for the reimbursement, or unless the reimbursement will be made by the federal government by law or agreement.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 11; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 7; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.